Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1569
Basic data, defined.

For purposes of section 2-1568, basic data means recorded observations, calculations, or other information concerning: (1) Climatological, meteorological, hydrologic, hydraulic, topographic, and geologic conditions and phenomena, including soils and land use, as these relate to or affect surface and ground water resources, developed water supplies, water demands, and hydraulic structures; (2) occurrence, quantity, and quality of surface water resources, including variations with time, both short term and long range; (3) occurrence, quantity, and quality of ground water resources, including variations with time, natural and artificial recharge, natural and artificial disposal, and information as to the hydraulic characteristics of underground aquifers and reservoirs; (4) sediment production, transport, and disposition; (5) biologic data for streams, lakes, and reservoirs; (6) water rights; (7) occurrence, types, locations, and amounts of consumptive and nonconsumptive uses and demands for water, including diversions and extractions therefor, and variations over time; (8) occurrence, quantity, and quality of waste discharges and return flows, and variations thereof over time; (9) locations, characteristics, and operational criteria of works constructed to store, replenish, regulate, divert, extract, transport, distribute, protect, and improve surface and ground water resources; (10) project and facility operation data; (11) demographic data; and (12) economic and fiscal information.

Laws 1969, c. 382, § 2, p. 1349;

Laws 2005, LB 342, § 2.